California, session 20252026, SB629.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) Numerous studies indicate that two of the most important factors for increasing the survivability of homes in the face of wildfire are building to the state’s wildland-urban interface (WUI) building standards and maintaining defensible space as required by Section 4290 of the Public Resources Code. Homes built to these standards are up to 40 percent less likely to be destroyed by a wildfire. These measures are critical in reducing property loss, protecting lives, and aiding firefighting efforts.(2) Building to the WUI building standards is cost effective. Several studies demonstrate that building to the WUI standards costs the same as, or less than, building to the standards that apply in the rest of the state.(3) Building to the WUI building standards and maintaining defensible space also qualifies homeowners for discounts on their insurance under the Safer from Wildfire Framework developed by the Department of Insurance.(4) Only homes in certain fire hazard severity zones designated by the State Fire Marshal must be built to the WUI building standards and maintain defensible space. Similarly, the state’s standards for fire safe roads for new development and legislative requirements to plan for and mitigate the threat of wildfire also only apply in those zones.(5) Current maps of fire hazard severity zones do not account for the potential for homes and other buildings to act as fuel and spread wildfire. Accordingly, significant areas that have burned in wildfires in recent years are not included in a fire hazard severity zone, including Coffey Park in the County of Sonoma.(b) This act shall be known and may be cited as the Keeping Communities Safe from Wildfire Act of 2025.SEC. 2. Section 51178 of the Government Code is amended to read:51178. (a) The State Fire Marshal shall identify areas in the state as moderate, high, and very high fire hazard severity zones based on consistent statewide criteria and based on the severity of fire hazard that is expected to prevail in those areas. Moderate, high, and very high fire hazard severity zones shall be based on fuel loading, slope, fire weather, and other relevant factors including all of the following:(1) Areas where winds have been identified by the Office of the State Fire Marshal as a major cause of wildfire spread.(2) Areas burned in a wildfire, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 51179.5.(3) Areas at risk for an urban conflagration that accounts for the potential for structures to serve as a fuel source that extends the ember cast outside of wildland areas.(4) Areas where agricultural land affects fire hazard.(b) The State Fire Marshal shall, at least 60 days before finalizing the designations pursuant to subdivision (a), publish the model and methodology used to develop the fire hazard severity zones on its internet website.SEC. 3. Section 51179.5 is added to the Government Code, to read:51179.5. (a) For purposes of this section:(1) “Area burned in a wildfire” means any land area included within the perimeter of a wildfire, as shown on an incident map posted on the internet website of the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, that meets any of the following conditions:(A) The wildfire burned 1,000 or more acres.(B) The wildfire destroyed more than 10 structures.(C) The wildfire resulted in one or more fatalities.(2) “Post-wildfire safety area” means an area burned in a wildfire as designated pursuant to subdivision (b).(3) “State fire protection standards” means all of the following, or their successor provisions:(A) Chapter 7A of the California Building Code (Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations).(B) Chapter 49 of the California Fire Code.(C) Section R337 of the California Residential Code.(D) Chapter 12-7A of the California Referenced Standards Code.(E) Subchapter 2 (commencing with Section 1270) of Chapter 7 of Division 1.5 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.(F) Article 3 (commencing with Section 1299) of Subchapter 3 of Chapter 7 of Division 1.5 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.(G) Regulations implementing an ember-resistant zone pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 51182.(b) (1) For wildfires occurring on or after January 1, 2025, the State Fire Marshal shall designate any area burned in a wildfire as a post-wildfire safety area and shall transmit a map of the post-wildfire safety area to any local agency with jurisdiction over territory in the designated area within 90 days of the wildfire reaching 100 percent containment, or by May 1, 2026, whichever is later.(2) The designation of a post-wildfire safety area by the State Fire Marshal pursuant to this subdivision shall be exempt from the rulemaking provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2.(c) The local agency shall, within 10 business days of receiving the map transmitted pursuant to subdivision (b), and in a manner consistent with subdivision (g) of Section 51179, post a notice at the office of the county recorder, county assessor, and city or county planning agency identifying the location of the post-wildfire safety area. The map of the post-wildfire safety area shall also be posted on the internet website of the local agency.(d) The designation of a post-wildfire safety area pursuant to subdivision (b) shall trigger the application of the state fire protection standards in a post-wildfire safety area 30 days following the transmission of the map by the State Fire Marshal pursuant to subdivision (b).(e) A city or county with territory in a post-wildfire safety area shall comply with paragraph (3) of subdivision (g) of Section 65302 according to the schedule provided in that subdivision.SEC. 4. Section 51181 of the Government Code is amended to read:51181. (a) The State Fire Marshal shall periodically review the areas in the state identified as very high fire hazard severity zones pursuant to this chapter, and as necessary, shall make recommendations relative to very high fire hazard severity zones. This review shall coincide with the review of state responsibility area lands every five years and, when possible, fall within the time frames for each county’s general plan update. Any revision of areas included in a very high fire hazard severity zone shall be made in accordance with Sections 51178 and 51179.(b) Whenever the State Fire Marshal reviews areas pursuant to subdivision (a), the State Fire Marshal shall publish, in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 51178, the model and methodology used pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 51178.SEC. 5. Section 65302 of the Government Code is amended to read:65302. The general plan shall consist of a statement of development policies and shall include a diagram or diagrams and text setting forth objectives, principles, standards, and plan proposals. The plan shall include the following elements:(a) A land use element that designates the proposed general distribution and general location and extent of the uses of the land for housing, business, industry, open space, including agriculture, natural resources, recreation, and enjoyment of scenic beauty, education, public buildings and grounds, solid and liquid waste disposal facilities, greenways, as defined in Section 816.52 of the Civil Code, and other categories of public and private uses of land. The location and designation of the extent of the uses of the land for public and private uses shall consider the identification of land and natural resources pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (d). The land use element shall include a statement of the standards of population density and building intensity recommended for the various districts and other territory covered by the plan. The land use element shall identify and annually review those areas covered by the plan that are subject to flooding identified by flood plain mapping prepared by the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA) or the Department of Water Resources. The land use element shall also do both of the following:(1) Designate in a land use category that provides for timber production those parcels of real property zoned for timberland production pursuant to the California Timberland Productivity Act of 1982 (Chapter 6.7 (commencing with Section 51100) of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5).(2) Consider the impact of new growth on military readiness activities carried out on military bases, installations, and operating and training areas, when proposing zoning ordinances or designating land uses covered by the general plan for land, or other territory adjacent to military facilities, or underlying designated military aviation routes and airspace.(A) In determining the impact of new growth on military readiness activities, information provided by military facilities shall be considered. Cities and counties shall address military impacts based on information from the military and other sources.(B) The following definitions govern this paragraph:(i) “Military readiness activities” mean all of the following:(I) Training, support, and operations that prepare the members of the military for combat.(II) Operation, maintenance, and security of any military installation.(III) Testing of military equipment, vehicles, weapons, and sensors for proper operation or suitability for combat use.(ii) “Military installation” means a base, camp, post, station, yard, center, homeport facility for any ship, or other activity under the jurisdiction of the United States Department of Defense as defined in paragraph (1) of subsection (e) of Section 2687 of Title 10 of the United States Code.(b) (1) A circulation element consisting of the general location and extent of existing and proposed major thoroughfares, transportation routes, terminals, any military airports and ports, and other local public utilities and facilities, all correlated with the land use element of the plan.(2) (A) Commencing January 1, 2011, upon any substantive revision of the circulation element, the legislative body shall modify the circulation element to plan for a balanced, multimodal transportation network that meets the needs of all users of streets, roads, and highways for safe and convenient travel in a manner that is suitable to the rural, suburban, or urban context of the general plan.(B) Upon any substantive revision of the circulation element on or after January 1, 2025, the legislative body shall do all of the following:(i) Incorporate the principles of the Federal Highway Administration’s Safe System Approach, in the circulation element by including policies that aim to eliminate fatal and serious injuries for all road users through a holistic view of the roadway system, including provisions that account for human error, recognize vulnerable road users, and promote redundant and proactive safety measures.(ii) Develop bicycle plans, pedestrian plans, and traffic calming plans based on the policies and goals in the circulation element that shall address all of the following for any urbanized area within the scope of the general plan:(I) Identify safety corridors and any land or facility that generates high concentrations of bicyclists or pedestrians.(II) Use evidence-based strategies, including strategies identified in the United States Department of Transportation’s Strategic Highway Safety Plan to develop safety measures specific to those areas that are intended to eliminate traffic fatalities, with an emphasis on fatalities of bicyclists, pedestrians, and users of any other form of micromobility device in the areas identified in subclause (I).(III) Set goals for initiation and completion of all actions identified in the plans within 25 years of the date of adoption of the modified circulation element based upon projected development activities within urbanized areas within the scope of the general plan and projected availability of revenues.(C) (i) A county or city shall begin implementation of the modified circulation element plan specified in subparagraph (B) within two years of the date of adoption of the plan.(ii) A county or city shall regularly review the progress towards and identify impediments to completing implementation of the plan for a multimodal transportation network, including all bicycle plans, pedestrian plans, and traffic calming plans iterated in the modified circulation element, and the construction of any related infrastructure.(iii) A county or city shall consider revising the circulation element if, following the review under clause (ii), the county or city determines it will not reach the goals of the bicycle, pedestrian, or traffic calming plans within 25 years of the date of adoption of the modified circulation element.(D) For the purposes of this paragraph, the following definitions shall apply:(i) “Business activity district” has the same meaning as defined in Section 22358.9 of the Vehicle Code.(ii) “Land facilities that generate high concentrations of bicyclists or pedestrians” has the same meaning as described in Section 22358.7 of the Vehicle Code.(iii) “Micromobility device” means a bicycle, electric bicycle, or motorized scooter as those terms are defined and described in Division 1 (commencing with Section 100) of the Vehicle Code.(iv) “Safety corridor” has the same meaning as defined in Section 22358.7 of the Vehicle Code.(v) “Urbanized area” has the same meaning as defined in Section 21071 of the Public Resources Code.(E) For purposes of this paragraph, “users of streets, roads, and highways” mean bicyclists, children, persons with disabilities, motorists, movers of commercial goods, pedestrians, users of public transportation, and seniors.(c) A housing element as provided in Article 10.6 (commencing with Section 65580).(d) (1) A conservation element for the conservation, development, and utilization of natural resources, including water and its hydraulic force, forests, soils, rivers and other waters, harbors, fisheries, wildlife, minerals, and other natural resources. The conservation element shall consider the effect of development within the jurisdiction, as described in the land use element, on natural resources located on public lands, including military installations. The conservation element shall consider the effect of development within the jurisdiction, as described in the land use element, on the movement of wildlife and habitat connectivity. That portion of the conservation element including waters shall be developed in coordination with any countywide water agency and with all district and city agencies, including flood management, water conservation, or groundwater agencies that have developed, served, controlled, managed, or conserved water of any type for any purpose in the county or city for which the plan is prepared. Coordination shall include the discussion and evaluation of any water supply and demand information described in Section 65352.5, if that information has been submitted by the water agency to the city or county.(2) The conservation element may also cover all of the following:(A) The reclamation of land and waters.(B) Prevention and control of the pollution of streams and other waters.(C) Regulation of the use of land in stream channels and other areas required for the accomplishment of the conservation plan.(D) Prevention, control, and correction of the erosion of soils, beaches, and shores.(E) Protection of watersheds.(F) The location, quantity, and quality of the rock, sand, and gravel resources.(3) Upon the next revision of the housing element on or after January 1, 2009, the conservation element shall identify rivers, creeks, streams, flood corridors, riparian habitats, and land that may accommodate floodwater for purposes of groundwater recharge and stormwater management.(4) Upon the adoption or next revision of one or more elements on or after January 1, 2028, the conservation element shall be updated to:(A) Identify and analyze connectivity areas, permeability, and natural landscape areas within the jurisdiction, as those terms are defined in Section 158 of the Streets and Highways Code.(B) Identify and analyze existing or planned wildlife passage features, as defined in Section 158 of the Streets and Highways Code, including, but not limited to, wildlife passage features included in the inventory of connectivity needs on the state highway system, as described in Section 158.1 of the Streets and Highways Code, to ensure that planned development does not undermine the effectiveness of existing and potential wildlife passage features, as defined in Section 158 of the Streets and Highways Code.(C) (i) Consider the impacts of development and the barriers caused by development to wildlife and habitat connectivity.(ii) For the purposes of this subparagraph, “wildlife” has the same meaning as defined in Section 89.5 of the Fish and Game Code.(D) Avoid, minimize, or mitigate impacts and barriers to wildlife movement to the extent feasible.(E) Analyze and consider opportunities to remediate existing barriers to wildlife connectivity and restore degraded habitat and open space.(5) If a city, county, or city and county has already included policies in existing plans, including its certified local coastal plan, that meet the requirements of paragraph (4), the city, county, or city and county may incorporate the plan by reference into the general plan to comply with this section.(6) In preparing to update the conservation element, the city, county, or city and county may do any of the following:(A) Consider incorporating appropriate standards, policies, and feasible implementation programs such as wildlife-friendly fencing and lighting, buffers from sensitive resources, prohibitions on invasive plants, habitat connectivity overlay zones, and compact development standards, or consider whether adoption of ordinances is necessary to feasibly implement these standards, policies, and implementation programs, and include goals to adopt any necessary ordinances.(B) Consult with the Department of Fish and Wildlife, any California Native American tribe that is on the contact list maintained by the Native American Heritage Commission and that has traditional lands located within the city’s, county’s, or city and county’s jurisdiction, and any open-space district that owns lands designated for conservation within the city’s, county’s, or city and county’s jurisdiction. Upon receiving a request for consultation, the department, tribe, or district may, in its sole discretion, accept or refuse to consult, based on the priority of natural resources impacted or other factors.(C) Consider relevant best available science as appropriate, including, but not limited to, peer-reviewed literature, citable publicly available datasets, publicly sourced online datasets, and information and reports from government agencies, California Native American tribes, and academic institutions.(D) Consider the most appropriately scaled scientific information on linkages, corridors, and other locations that are essential to maintain landscape connectivity, including, but not limited to, any of the following:(i) Habitat linkages and wildlife corridors, such as those identified and summarized in the Areas of Conservation Emphasis, as defined by subdivision (a) of Section 1851 of the Fish and Game Code, and in regional habitat connectivity assessments.(ii) Wildlife corridors, such as migration corridors identified by global positioning system collar studies.(iii) Wildlife movement barriers, such as connectivity areas, as defined by subdivision (a) of Section 158 of the Streets and Highways Code, and barriers identified by the Department of Fish and Wildlife’s Restoring California’s Wildlife Connectivity report.(iv) Other connectivity considerations, such as those outlined in the State Wildlife Action Plan, habitat conservation plans approved pursuant to Section 1539 of Title 16 of the United States Code, natural community conservation plans approved pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2800) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code, regional conservation investment strategies approved pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 1850) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code, and other relevant plans, policies, and ordinances adopted by neighboring jurisdictions.(7) In preparing to update the conservation element, the city, county, or city and county may consult with other appropriate local, state, or federal agencies, or academic institutions, as deemed appropriate by the city or county.(8) The city, county, or city and county may meet the requirements in paragraphs (4) to (6), inclusive, in a separate component or section of the general plan entitled a wildlife connectivity element.(e) An open-space element as provided in Article 10.5 (commencing with Section 65560).(f) (1) A noise element that shall identify and appraise noise problems in the community. The noise element shall analyze and quantify, to the extent practicable, as determined by the legislative body, current and projected noise levels for all of the following sources:(A) Highways and freeways.(B) Primary arterials and major local streets.(C) Passenger and freight online railroad operations and ground rapid transit systems.(D) Commercial, general aviation, heliport, helistop, and military airport operations, aircraft overflights, jet engine test stands, and all other ground facilities and maintenance functions related to airport operation.(E) Local industrial plants, including, but not limited to, railroad classification yards.(F) Other ground stationary noise sources, including, but not limited to, military installations, identified by local agencies as contributing to the community noise environment.(2) Noise contours shall be shown for all of these sources and stated in terms of community noise equivalent level (CNEL) or day-night average sound level (Ldn). The noise contours shall be prepared on the basis of noise monitoring or following generally accepted noise modeling techniques for the various sources identified in subparagraphs (A) to (F) of paragraph (1), inclusive.(3) The noise contours shall be used as a guide for establishing a pattern of land uses in the land use element that minimizes the exposure of community residents to excessive noise.(4) The noise element shall include implementation measures and possible solutions that address existing and foreseeable noise problems, if any. The adopted noise element shall serve as a guideline for compliance with the state’s noise insulation standards.(g) (1) A safety element for the protection of the community from any unreasonable risks associated with the effects of seismically induced surface rupture, ground shaking, ground failure, tsunami, seiche, and dam failure; slope instability leading to mudslides and landslides; subsidence; liquefaction; and other seismic hazards identified pursuant to Chapter 7.8 (commencing with Section 2690) of Division 2 of the Public Resources Code, and other geologic hazards known to the legislative body; flooding; and wildland and urban fires. The safety element shall include mapping of known seismic and other geologic hazards. It shall also address evacuation routes, military installations, peakload water supply requirements, and minimum road widths and clearances around structures, as those items relate to identified fire and geologic hazards.(2) The safety element, upon the next revision of the housing element on or after January 1, 2009, shall also do the following:(A) Identify information regarding flood hazards, including, but not limited to, the following:(i) Flood hazard zones. As used in this subdivision, “flood hazard zone” means an area subject to flooding that is delineated as either a special hazard area or an area of moderate or minimal hazard on an official flood insurance rate map issued by FEMA. The identification of a flood hazard zone does not imply that areas outside the flood hazard zones or uses permitted within flood hazard zones will be free from flooding or flood damage.(ii) National Flood Insurance Program maps published by FEMA.(iii) Information about flood hazards that is available from the United States Army Corps of Engineers.(iv) Designated floodway maps that are available from the Central Valley Flood Protection Board.(v) Dam failure inundation maps prepared pursuant to Section 6161 of the Water Code that are available from the Department of Water Resources.(vi) Awareness Floodplain Mapping Program maps and 200-year flood plain maps that are or may be available from, or accepted by, the Department of Water Resources.(vii) Maps of levee protection zones.(viii) Areas subject to inundation in the event of the failure of project or nonproject levees or floodwalls.(ix) Historical data on flooding, including locally prepared maps of areas that are subject to flooding, areas that are vulnerable to flooding after wildfires, and sites that have been repeatedly damaged by flooding.(x) Existing and planned development in flood hazard zones, including structures, roads, utilities, and essential public facilities.(xi) Local, state, and federal agencies with responsibility for flood protection, including special districts and local offices of emergency services.(B) Establish a set of comprehensive goals, policies, and objectives based on the information identified pursuant to subparagraph (A), for the protection of the community from the unreasonable risks of flooding, including, but not limited to:(i) Avoiding or minimizing the risks of flooding to new development.(ii) Evaluating whether new development should be located in flood hazard zones, and identifying construction methods or other methods to minimize damage if new development is located in flood hazard zones.(iii) Maintaining the structural and operational integrity of essential public facilities during flooding.(iv) Locating, when feasible, new essential public facilities outside of flood hazard zones, including hospitals and health care facilities, emergency shelters, fire stations, emergency command centers, and emergency communications facilities or identifying construction methods or other methods to minimize damage if these facilities are located in flood hazard zones.(v) Establishing cooperative working relationships among public agencies with responsibility for flood protection.(C) Establish a set of feasible implementation measures designed to carry out the goals, policies, and objectives established pursuant to subparagraph (B).(3) Upon the next revision of the housing element on or after January 1, 2014, the safety element shall be reviewed and updated as necessary to address the risk of fire for land classified as state responsibility areas, as defined in Section 4102 of the Public Resources Code, land classified as very high fire hazard severity zones, as defined in Section 51177, and land classified as a post-wildfire safety area, as defined in Section 51179.5. This review shall consider the advice included in the Office of Planning and Research’s most recent publication of “Fire Hazard Planning, General Plan Technical Advice Series” and shall also include all of the following:(A) Information regarding fire hazards, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(i) Fire hazard severity zone maps available from the Office of the State Fire Marshal.(ii) Any historical data on wildfires available from local agencies or a reference to where the data can be found.(iii) Information about wildfire hazard areas that may be available from the United States Geological Survey.(iv) General location and distribution of existing and planned uses of land in very high fire hazard severity zones and in state responsibility areas, including structures, roads, utilities, and essential public facilities. The location and distribution of planned uses of land shall not require defensible space compliance measures required by state law or local ordinance to occur on publicly owned lands or open-space designations of homeowner associations.(v) Local, state, and federal agencies with responsibility for fire protection, including special districts and local offices of emergency services.(B) A set of goals, policies, and objectives based on the information identified pursuant to subparagraph (A) for the protection of the community from the unreasonable risk of wildfire.(C) A set of feasible implementation measures designed to carry out the goals, policies, and objectives based on the information identified pursuant to subparagraph (B), including, but not limited to, all of the following:(i) Avoiding or minimizing the wildfire hazards associated with new uses of land.(ii) Locating, when feasible, new essential public facilities outside of high fire risk areas, including, but not limited to, hospitals and health care facilities, emergency shelters, emergency command centers, and emergency communications facilities, or identifying construction methods or other methods to minimize damage if these facilities are located in a state responsibility area or very high fire hazard severity zone.(iii) Designing adequate infrastructure if a new development is located in a state responsibility area or in a very high fire hazard severity zone, including safe access for emergency response vehicles, visible street signs, and water supplies for structural fire suppression.(iv) Working cooperatively with public agencies with responsibility for fire protection.(D) If a city or county has adopted a fire safety plan or document separate from the general plan, an attachment of, or reference to, a city’s or county’s adopted fire safety plan or document that fulfills commensurate goals and objectives and contains information required pursuant to this paragraph.(4) Upon the next revision of a local hazard mitigation plan, adopted in accordance with the federal Disaster Mitigation Act of 2000 (Public Law 106-390), on or after January 1, 2017, or, if a local jurisdiction has not adopted a local hazard mitigation plan, beginning on or before January 1, 2022, the safety element shall be reviewed and updated as necessary to address climate adaptation and resiliency strategies applicable to the city or county. This review shall consider advice provided in the Office of Planning and Research’s General Plan Guidelines and shall include all of the following:(A) (i) A vulnerability assessment that identifies the risks that climate change poses to the local jurisdiction and the geographic areas at risk from climate change impacts, including, but not limited to, an assessment of how climate change may affect the risks addressed pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3).(ii) Information that may be available from federal, state, regional, and local agencies that will assist in developing the vulnerability assessment and the adaptation policies and strategies required pursuant to subparagraph (B), including, but not limited to, all of the following:(I) Information from the internet-based Cal-Adapt tool.(II) Information from the most recent version of the California Adaptation Planning Guide.(III) Information from local agencies on the types of assets, resources, and populations that will be sensitive to various climate change exposures.(IV) Information from local agencies on their current ability to deal with the impacts of climate change.(V) Historical data on natural events and hazards, including locally prepared maps of areas subject to previous risk, areas that are vulnerable, and sites that have been repeatedly damaged.(VI) Existing and planned development in identified at-risk areas, including structures, roads, utilities, and essential public facilities.(VII) Federal, state, regional, and local agencies with responsibility for the protection of public health and safety and the environment, including special districts and local offices of emergency services.(B) A set of adaptation and resilience goals, policies, and objectives based on the information specified in subparagraph (A) for the protection of the community.(C) A set of feasible implementation measures designed to carry out the goals, policies, and objectives identified pursuant to subparagraph (B), including, but not limited to, all of the following:(i) Feasible methods to avoid or minimize climate change impacts associated with new uses of land.(ii) The location, when feasible, of new essential public facilities outside of at-risk areas, including, but not limited to, hospitals and health care facilities, emergency shelters, emergency command centers, and emergency communications facilities, or identifying construction methods or other methods to minimize damage if these facilities are located in at-risk areas.(iii) The designation of adequate and feasible infrastructure located in an at-risk area.(iv) Guidelines for working cooperatively with relevant local, regional, state, and federal agencies.(v) The identification of natural infrastructure that may be used in adaptation projects, where feasible. Where feasible, the plan shall use existing natural features and ecosystem processes, or the restoration of natural features and ecosystem processes, when developing alternatives for consideration. For purposes of this clause, “natural infrastructure” means using natural ecological systems or processes to reduce vulnerability to climate change related hazards, or other related climate change effects, while increasing the long-term adaptive capacity of coastal and inland areas by perpetuating or restoring ecosystem services. This includes, but is not limited to, the conservation, preservation, or sustainable management of any form of aquatic or terrestrial vegetated open space, such as beaches, dunes, tidal marshes, reefs, seagrass, parks, rain gardens, and urban tree canopies. It also includes systems and practices that use or mimic natural processes, such as permeable pavements, bioswales, and other engineered systems, such as levees that are combined with restored natural systems, to provide clean water, conserve ecosystem values and functions, and provide a wide array of benefits to people and wildlife.(D) (i) If a city or county has adopted the local hazard mitigation plan, or other climate adaptation plan or document that fulfills commensurate goals and objectives and contains the information required pursuant to this paragraph, separate from the general plan, an attachment of, or reference to, the local hazard mitigation plan or other climate adaptation plan or document.(ii) Cities or counties that have an adopted hazard mitigation plan, or other climate adaptation plan or document that substantially complies with this section, or have substantially equivalent provisions to this subdivision in their general plans, may use that information in the safety element to comply with this subdivision, and shall summarize and incorporate by reference into the safety element the other general plan provisions, or climate adaptation plan or document, specifically showing how each requirement of this subdivision has been met.(5) Upon the next revision of the housing element on or after January 1, 2020, the safety element shall be reviewed and updated as necessary to identify residential developments in any hazard area identified in the safety element that do not have at least two emergency evacuation routes.(6) After the initial revision of the safety element pursuant to paragraphs (2), (3), (4), and (5), the planning agency shall review and, if necessary, revise the safety element upon each revision of the housing element or local hazard mitigation plan, but not less than once every eight years, to identify new information relating to flood and fire hazards and climate adaptation and resiliency strategies applicable to the city or county that was not available during the previous revision of the safety element.(7) Cities and counties that have flood plain management ordinances that have been approved by FEMA that substantially comply with this section, or have substantially equivalent provisions to this subdivision in their general plans, may use that information in the safety element to comply with this subdivision, and shall summarize and incorporate by reference into the safety element the other general plan provisions or the flood plain ordinance, specifically showing how each requirement of this subdivision has been met.(8) Before the periodic review of its general plan and before preparing or revising its safety element, each city and county shall consult the California Geological Survey of the Department of Conservation, the Central Valley Flood Protection Board, if the city or county is located within the boundaries of the Sacramento and San Joaquin Drainage District, as set forth in Section 8501 of the Water Code, and the Office of Emergency Services for the purpose of including information known by and available to the department, the agency, and the board required by this subdivision.(9) To the extent that a county’s safety element is sufficiently detailed and contains appropriate policies and programs for adoption by a city, a city may adopt that portion of the county’s safety element that pertains to the city’s planning area in satisfaction of the requirement imposed by this subdivision.(h) (1) An environmental justice element, or related goals, policies, and objectives integrated in other elements, that identifies disadvantaged communities within the area covered by the general plan of the city, county, or city and county, if the city, county, or city and county has a disadvantaged community. The environmental justice element, or related environmental justice goals, policies, and objectives integrated in other elements, shall do all of the following:(A) Identify objectives and policies to reduce the unique or compounded health risks in disadvantaged communities by means that include, but are not limited to, the reduction of pollution exposure, including the improvement of air quality, and the promotion of public facilities, food access, safe and sanitary homes, and physical activity.(B) Identify objectives and policies to promote civic engagement in the public decisionmaking process.(C) Identify objectives and policies that prioritize improvements and programs that address the needs of disadvantaged communities.(2) A city, county, or city and county subject to this subdivision shall adopt or review the environmental justice element, or the environmental justice goals, policies, and objectives in other elements, upon the adoption or next revision of two or more elements concurrently on or after January 1, 2018.(3) By adding this subdivision, the Legislature does not intend to require a city, county, or city and county to take any action prohibited by the United States Constitution or the California Constitution.(4) For purposes of this subdivision, the following terms shall apply:(A) “Disadvantaged communities” means an area identified by the California Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code or an area that is a low-income area that is disproportionately affected by environmental pollution and other hazards that can lead to negative health effects, exposure, or environmental degradation.(B) “Public facilities” includes public improvements, public services, and community amenities, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 66000.(C) “Low-income area” means an area with household incomes at or below 80 percent of the statewide median income or with household incomes at or below the threshold designated as low income by the Department of Housing and Community Development’s list of state income limits adopted pursuant to Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code.SEC. 6. Section 4202 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:4202. (a) The State Fire Marshal shall classify lands within state responsibility areas into fire hazard severity zones. Each zone shall embrace relatively homogeneous lands and shall be based on fuel loading, slope, fire weather, and other relevant factors present, including all of the following:(1) Areas where winds have been identified by the department as a major cause of wildfire spread.(2) Areas burned in a wildfire, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 51179.5 of the Government Code.(3) Areas at risk for an urban conflagration that account for the potential for structures to serve as a fuel source that extend the ember cast outside of the wildland areas.(4) Areas where agricultural land affects fire hazard.(b) At least 60 days before finalizing the classifications pursuant to subdivision (a), the State Fire Marshal shall publish the model and methodology used to develop the fire hazard severity zones on the State Fire Marshal’s internet website.SEC. 7. Section 4204 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:4204. (a) The State Fire Marshal shall periodically review zones designated and rated pursuant to this article and, as necessary, shall revise zones or their ratings or repeal the designation of zones. Any revision of a zone or its rating or any repeal of a zone shall conform to the requirements of Section 4203. In addition, the revision or repeal of a zone may be petitioned pursuant to Sections 11340.6 and 11340.7 of the Government Code.(b) Whenever the State Fire Marshal revises zones or their ratings or repeals the designation of zones pursuant to subdivision (a), the State Fire Marshal shall publish, in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 4202, the model and methodology used pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 4202.SEC. 8. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.